Wisconsin, session 2025, AB627.
do enact as follows:AB627,11Section 1. 95.68 (1) (aj) of the statutes is created to read:AB627,2,5295.68 (1) (aj) “Class A animal market license” means an annual license 3authorizing a person to operate an animal market at which the person may conduct 4livestock and wild animal sales and auction livestock on any number of days during 5the license year.AB627,26Section 2. 95.68 (1) (ak) of the statutes is created to read:AB627,2,11795.68 (1) (ak) “Class B animal market license” means an annual license 8authorizing a person to operate an animal market at which the person may conduct 9livestock sales on any number of days during the license year and auction livestock 10on no more than 4 days during the license year. A Class B animal market license 11does not authorize a person to conduct a sale or auction of a wild animal.AB627,312Section 3. 95.68 (1) (aL) of the statutes is created to read:AB627,2,181395.68 (1) (aL) “Class E animal market license” means an annual license 14authorizing a person to operate an animal market at which the person may conduct 15sales of equine animals on any number of days during the license year. A Class E 16animal market license does not authorize a person to conduct an auction of an 17equine animal. A Class E animal market license does not authorize a person to 18conduct a sale or auction of a wild animal or livestock that is not an equine animal. AB627,419Section 4. 95.68 (4) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 95.68 (4) (a) (intro.) and 20amended to read:AB627,3,3195.68 (4) (a) (intro.) The department shall, by rule, specify the charge a 2nonrefundable annual fee for an animal market license issued under this section. 3section as follows:AB627,54Section 5. 95.68 (4) (a) 1. of the statutes is created to read:AB627,3,5595.68 (4) (a) 1. For a Class A animal market license, $420.AB627,66Section 6. 95.68 (4) (a) 2. of the statutes is created to read:AB627,3,7795.68 (4) (a) 2. For a Class B animal market license, $220.AB627,78Section 7. 95.68 (4) (a) 3. of the statutes is created to read:AB627,3,9995.68 (4) (a) 3. For a Class E animal market license, $280.AB627,810Section 8. 95.68 (4) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB627,3,141195.68 (4) (b) 1. If the department reinspects an animal market because the 12department has found a violation of this chapter or rules promulgated under this 13chapter, the department shall charge the animal market operator the reinspection 14fee specified under subd. 2. a $150 reinspection fee.AB627,915Section 9. 95.68 (4) (b) 2. of the statutes is repealed.AB627,1016Section 10. 95.68 (7) of the statutes is renumbered 95.68 (7) (a).AB627,1117Section 11. 95.68 (7) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB627,3,191895.68 (7) (b) The department shall charge a nonrefundable annual $20 fee for 19each animal transport vehicle registered under par. (a).AB627,1220Section 12. 95.68 (8) of the statutes is amended to read:AB627,4,52195.68 (8) Rules. The department may promulgate rules to regulate the 22operation of animal markets, including rules related to market operator 23qualifications, market construction and maintenance, construction and 24maintenance of animal transport vehicles, identification of animal transport 1vehicles, disease sanitation, humane treatment of animals, identification of 2animals, record keeping, reports to the department and compliance with applicable 3financial security requirements under state or federal law. The department may 4not promulgate rules increasing the fees required under this section or creating new 5fees related to this section.AB627,136Section 13. 95.69 (4) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB627,4,9795.69 (4) (a) The department shall, by rule, specify the charge a 8nonrefundable annual $220 fee for an animal dealer license issued under this 9section.AB627,1410Section 14. 95.69 (4) (b) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB627,4,141195.69 (4) (b) 1. If the department reinspects an animal dealer operation 12because the department has found a violation of this chapter or rules promulgated 13under this chapter, the department shall charge the animal dealer the reinspection 14fee specified under subd. 2. a $150 reinspection fee.AB627,1515Section 15. 95.69 (4) (b) 2. of the statutes is repealed.AB627,1616Section 16. 95.69 (5) (a) 3. of the statutes is created to read:AB627,4,181795.69 (5) (a) 3. While operating under a Class B animal market license, 18conducted a sale or auction of a wild animal.AB627,1719Section 17. 95.69 (5) (a) 4. of the statutes is created to read:AB627,4,212095.69 (5) (a) 4. While operating under a Class E animal market license, 21conducted an auction of an equine animal.AB627,1822Section 18. 95.69 (5) (a) 5. of the statutes is created to read:AB627,5,22395.69 (5) (a) 5. While operating under a Class E animal market license, 1conducted a sale or auction of a wild animal or livestock that is not an equine 2animal.AB627,193Section 19. 95.69 (7) of the statutes is renumbered 95.69 (7) (a).AB627,204Section 20. 95.69 (7) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB627,5,6595.69 (7) (b) The department shall charge a nonrefundable annual $20 fee for 6each animal transport vehicle registered under par. (a).AB627,217Section 21. 95.69 (8) of the statutes is amended to read:AB627,5,15895.69 (8) Rules. The department may promulgate rules to regulate animal 9dealers, including rules related to animal dealer qualifications, construction and 10maintenance of animal transport vehicles, identification of animal transport 11vehicles, disease sanitation, humane treatment of animals, identification of 12animals, record keeping, reports to the department and compliance with applicable 13financial security requirements under state or federal law. The department may 14not promulgate rules increasing the fees required under this section or creating new 15fees related to this section.AB627,2216Section 22. 95.71 (5) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB627,5,191795.71 (5) (a) The department shall, by rule, specify the charge a 18nonrefundable annual $60 fee for an animal trucker license issued under this 19section.AB627,2320Section 23. 95.71 (5) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB627,6,22195.71 (5) (b) The department shall, by rule, specify the fee to be paid charge a 22$20 fee for each animal transport vehicle registered under sub. (4). If during any 23license year an animal trucker registers an animal transport vehicle that was not 24registered with the animal trucker’s annual license application under sub. (3), the 1animal trucker shall pay the fee required under this paragraph at the time of 2registration.AB627,243Section 24. 95.71 (5) (c) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB627,6,7495.71 (5) (c) 1. If the department reinspects an animal trucker operation 5because the department has found a violation of this chapter or rules promulgated 6under this chapter, the department shall charge the animal trucker the 7reinspection fee specified under subd. 2. a $150 reinspection fee.AB627,258Section 25. 95.71 (5) (c) 2. of the statutes is repealed. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab627 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab627 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB627 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB627 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB627: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting